th: รูปทรงส่วนโค้งและความนูนของฉาบแครช: สูง; ต่ำ; กลาง; อื่นๆ
vi: Hình dạng chũm chọe va chạm: Cao; Thấp; Vừa; Khác
el: Προφίλ crash κυμβάλου: Υψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Perfil do prato de ataque: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
sl-SI: Profil udarnih činel: Visoko; Nizko; Srednje; Drugo
es: Perfil del platillo crash: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otro
fi: Aksenttipellin profiili: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Muu
pt-BR: Perfil do címbalo de ataque: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outros
en: Crash cymbal profile: High; Low; Medium; Other
lt-LT: Crash lėkštės profilis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Kita
da: Crash-bækkenprofil: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
zh-TW: 碎音鈸輪廓: 高; 低; 中; 其他
zh-CN: 吊镲轮廓: 高; 低; 中; 其他
hr-HR: Profil crash činele: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Ostalo
tr: Crash zil profili: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
nl: Crashbekken profiel: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Overige
ja: クラッシュシンバルプロファイル: ハイ; ロー; ミディアム; その他
sk-SK: Profil činela Crash: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
ko: 크래시 심벌 프로파일: 하이; 로우; 미디엄; 기타
nb: Profil for krasjcymbal: Høy; Lav; Medium; Annet
it: Profilo del piatto crash: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
cs: Profil činelu Crash: Vysoký; Nízký; Střední; Ostatní
sv: Profil för kraschcymbal: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
fr: Profil de cymbale crash: Haut; Bas; Moyen; Autre
pl: Profil talerza crash: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inny
bg-BG: Профил на crash чинел: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Други
hu: Beütő cintányér profilja: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
ro-RO: Profilul cinelului „crash”: Înalt; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
de: Profil des Crash-Beckens: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Andere
ru: Профиль крэш-тарелки: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другое